Arkansas, session 2025, SB49.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-324 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-324. Special tax rate for certain used motor vehicles,
motorboats, trailers, and semitrailers.
(a) In lieu of the gross receipts or gross proceeds taxes levied under
§§ 26-52-301 and 26-52-302, there is levied an excise tax on the gross
receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of a used motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer that has a sales price of at least four thousand
dollars ($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) the following
*CEB013*
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
at the rate of two and eight hundred seventy-five thousandths percent
(2.875%):
(1) A used motor vehicle that has a sales price of at least ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) but less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000);
and
(2) A used motorboat, trailer, or semitrailer that has a sales
price of at least four thousand dollars ($4,000) but less than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000).
(b) The tax levied in this section shall be in addition to:
(1) Any gross receipts or gross proceeds tax levied in the
Arkansas Constitution;
(2) Any gross receipts or gross proceeds tax levied by a
municipality or county; and
(3) Any additional gross receipts or gross proceeds tax levied
in an Arkansas city and resulting from an election within that city conducted
in accordance with §§ 26-52-601 — 26-52-606.
(c) For the purpose of determining whether the tax levied by this
section applies to the sale of a used motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer, or
semitrailer, the sales price for the used motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer,
or semitrailer shall not be reduced by:
(1) The value of a motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer or
semitrailer traded in as part payment on the purchase price of the newly
acquired motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer, or semitrailer; or
(2) The amount received by the purchaser for the sale of another
motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer, or semitrailer.
(d) The revenues generated by the tax levied under this section shall
be distributed as follows:
(1) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration under this section shall be deposited as general
revenues;
(2) Eight and five-tenths percent (8.5%) of the taxes, interest,
penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this section shall be
deposited into the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund; and
(3) Fourteen and nine-tenths percent (14.9%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this section
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
shall be deposited into the Educational Adequacy Fund.
(e) The excise tax levied under this section shall be collected and
paid in the same manner and at the same time as is prescribed in:
(1) § 26-52-510 for the collection and payment of gross
receipts taxes on motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers; and
(2) § 26-52-524 for the collection and payment of gross receipts
and taxes on motorboats.
(f) As used in this section, "motorboat" means the same as defined in
§ 27-101-103.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-510(b)(1)(B), concerning the direct
payment of sales tax by consumer-users on new and used motor vehicles,
trailers, or semitrailers, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i)(a) If the total consideration for the sale of the
new or used motor vehicle, or the new or used trailer, or semitrailer is less
than four thousand dollars ($4,000), no tax is due.
(b) If the total consideration for the sale of
the used motor vehicle is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), no tax is
due.
(c) If the total consideration for the sale of
a new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is four thousand dollars
($4,000) or more, the full gross receipts tax rate levied under this chapter
shall be levied and collected.
(ii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is at least four thousand dollars
($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the gross receipts tax
due shall be determined under § 26-52-324.
(iii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
or more:,
(a) The exemption under subdivision
(b)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this section does not apply;
(b) The special tax rate provided in § 26-52-
324 does not apply; and
(c) The the full gross receipts tax rate
levied under this chapter shall be levied and collected.
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
(iv) If the total consideration for the sale of the
used motor vehicle is at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) but less than
fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), the gross receipts tax due shall be
determined under §26-52-324.
(v) If the total consideration for the sale of the
used motor vehicle is fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more, the full
gross receipts tax rate levied under this chapter shall be levied and
collected.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-524. Direct payment of tax by consumer-user — New and used
motorboats — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "motorboat" means the same as defined in
§ 27-101-103.
(b)(1) On or before the time for applying for a certificate of number
as prescribed by § 27-101-304, a consumer shall pay to the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration the tax levied by this chapter and
all other gross receipts taxes levied by the state with respect to the sale
of a new or used motorboat required to be numbered in this state, instead of
the taxes being collected by the dealer or seller.
(2) The secretary shall require the payment of the taxes at the
time of registration before issuing a certificate of number for the new or
used motorboat.
(3)(A) The taxes apply regardless of whether the motorboat is
sold by a motorboat dealer or an individual, corporation, or partnership not
licensed as a motorboat dealer.
(B) The exemption in § 26-52-401(17) for isolated sales
does not apply to the sale of a motorboat.
(4) If the consumer fails to pay the taxes when due:
(A) There is assessed a penalty equal to ten percent (10%)
of the amount of taxes due; and
(B) The consumer shall pay to the secretary the penalty
under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section and the taxes due before the
secretary issues a certificate of number for the motorboat.
(c)(1)(A) Except as provided in this section, when a used motorboat is
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
taken in trade as a credit or part payment on the sale of a new or used
motorboat, the tax levied by this chapter and all other gross receipts taxes
levied by the state shall be paid on the net difference between the total
consideration for the new or used motorboat sold and the credit for the used
motorboat taken in trade.
(B)(i)(a) If the total consideration for the sale of the
new or used motorboat is less than four thousand dollars ($4,000), no tax is
due.
(b) If the total consideration for the sale of
a new motorboat is four thousand dollars ($4,000) or more, the full gross
receipts tax rate levied under this chapter shall be levied and collected.
(ii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
used motorboat is at least four thousand dollars ($4,000) but less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), the gross receipts tax due shall be determined
under § 26-52-324.
(iii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
used motorboat is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, the full gross
receipts tax rate levied under this chapter shall be levied and collected.
(C)(i) When a used motorboat is sold by a consumer, rather
than traded in as a credit or part payment on the sale of a new or used
motorboat, and the consumer subsequently purchases a new or used motorboat of
greater value within sixty (60) days of the sale, the tax levied by this
chapter and all other gross receipts taxes levied by the state shall be paid
on the net difference between the total consideration for the new or used
motorboat purchased subsequently and the amount received from the sale of the
used motorboat sold in lieu of a trade-in.
(ii)(a) Upon applying for a certificate of number
for the new or used motorboat, a consumer claiming the deduction provided by
subdivision (c)(1)(C)(i) of this section shall provide a bill of sale signed
by all parties to the transaction which reflects the total consideration paid
to the seller for the motorboat.
(b) A copy of the bill of sale shall be
deposited with the department at the time of applying for a certificate of
number for the new or used motorboat.
(c) The deduction provided by this section
shall not be allowed unless the taxpayer claiming the deduction provides a
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
copy of a bill of sale signed by all parties to the transaction which
reflects the total consideration paid to the seller for the motorboat.
(iii) If the taxpayer claiming the deduction
provided in this section fails to provide a bill of sale signed by all
parties to the transaction that reflects the total consideration paid to the
seller for the motorboat, tax shall be due on the total consideration paid
for the new or used motorboat without any deduction for the value of the item
sold.
(2)(A)(i) When a motorboat dealer removes a motorboat from its
inventory and the motorboat is used by the dealership as a service motorboat,
the dealer shall obtain a certificate of number, register and obtain a
certificate of title, and pay sales tax on the listed retail price of the new
motorboat.
(ii)(a) When the motorboat dealer returns the
service motorboat to inventory as a used motorboat and replaces it with a new
motorboat for dealership use as a service motorboat, the dealer shall pay
sales tax on the difference between the listed retail price of the new
service motorboat to be used by the dealership and the value of the used
service motorboat being returned to inventory.
(b) The value of the used service motorboat
shall be the highest listed wholesale price reflected in the most current
edition of a publication that is generally accepted by the industry as
providing an accurate valuation of used motorboats.
(B)(i) As used in this subsection, “service motorboat”
means a motorboat driven exclusively by an employee of the dealership and
used either to transport dealership customers or dealership parts and
equipment.
(ii) “Service motorboat” does not include motorboats
that are rented by the dealership, used as demonstration motorboats, or used
by dealership employees for personal use.
(d) All parts and accessories purchased by motorboat sellers for
resale or used by motorboat sellers for the reconditioning or rebuilding of
used motorboats intended for resale are exempt from gross receipts tax,
provided that the motorboat seller meets the requirements of § 26-52-
401(12)(A) and applicable rules promulgated by the secretary.
(e) This section does not repeal any exemption from this chapter.
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
(f) A credit is not allowed for sales or use taxes paid to another
state with respect to the purchase of a motorboat that first obtained a
certificate of number or title by the purchaser in Arkansas.
(g)(1)(A) A motorboat dealer with a permit under § 27-101-302(5) who
has purchased a used motorboat upon payment of all applicable fees may apply
for a certificate of number for the motorboat for the sole purpose of
obtaining a certificate of title to the motorboat without payment of gross
receipts tax, except as provided in subdivision (g)(1)(B) of this section.
(B)(i) The sale of a motorboat from the original franchise
dealer to any other dealer, person, corporation, or other entity other than a
franchise dealer of the same make of motorboat and which sale is reflected on
the statement of origin shall be subject to gross receipts tax.
(ii) The motorboat shall be considered a used
motorboat that shall have a registered certificate of number and be titled,
and tax shall be paid at the time of application for a certificate of number.
(iii) Subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section does not
apply in the circumstances described in subdivisions (g)(1)(B)(i) and (ii).
(2) If a certificate of number is issued for a motorboat under §
27-101-302(5)(C), the used motorboat titled by a dealer under this subsection
shall not be operated on the waters of this state unless there is displayed
on the used motorboat the identifying certificate of number issued under §
27-101-302(5)(C).
(h)(1) For purposes of this section, the total consideration for a
used motorboat shall be presumed to be the greater of the actual sales price
as provided on the bill of sale, invoice or financing agreement, or the
average loan value price of the motorboat as listed in the most current
edition of a publication that is generally accepted by the industry as
providing an accurate valuation of used motorboats.
(2) If the published loan value exceeds the invoiced price, the
taxpayer shall establish to the secretary's satisfaction that the price
reflected on the invoice or other document is true and correct.
(3) If the secretary determines that the invoiced price is not
the actual selling price of the motorboat, the total consideration will be
deemed to be the published loan value.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-53-126(b)(2), concerning the
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
compensating use tax on new and used motor vehicles, trailers, or
semitrailers, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) If the total consideration for the sale of the new or
used motor vehicle, or the new or used trailer, or semitrailer is less than
four thousand dollars ($4,000), no tax is due.
(ii) If the total consideration for the sale of the
used motor vehicle is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), no tax is
due.
(iii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is four thousand dollars ($4,000)
or more, the full compensating use tax rate levied under this chapter shall
be levied and collected.
(B) If the total consideration for the sale of a used
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is at least four thousand dollars
($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the compensating use
tax due shall be determined under § 26-53-150.
(C) If the total consideration for the sale of a used
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or
more:,
(i) The exemption under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(i) of
this section does not apply;
(ii) The special tax rate provided in § 26-53-150
does not apply; and
(iii) The the full compensating use tax rate levied
under this chapter shall be levied and collected.
(D) If the total consideration for the sale of the used
motor vehicle is at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) but less than
fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), the compensating use tax due shall be
determined under § 26-53-150.
(E) If the total consideration for the sale of the used
motor vehicle is fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more, the full
compensating use tax rate levied under this chapter shall be levied and
collected.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-53-150 is amended to read as follows:
26-53-150. Special tax rate for certain used motor vehicles,
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
motorboats, trailers, and semitrailers.
(a)(1) In lieu of the compensating use taxes levied under §§ 26-53-106
and 26-53-107, there is levied an excise tax for the privilege of storing,
using, distributing, or consuming a used motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer,
or semitrailer within this state if the sales price of the used motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is:
(A) For a used motor vehicle, at least ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) but less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000); and
(B) For a used motorboat, trailer, or semitrailer, at
least four thousand dollars ($4,000) but less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000).
(2) The excise tax levied under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section is levied at the rate of two and eight hundred seventy-five
thousandths percent (2.875%) of the sales price of the used motor vehicle,
motorboat, trailer, or semitrailer.
(b) The tax levied in this section shall be in addition to:
(1) Any compensating use tax levied in the Arkansas
Constitution;
(2) Any compensating use tax levied by a municipality or county;
and
(3) Any additional compensating use tax levied in an Arkansas
city under § 26-52-607.
(c) For the purpose of determining whether the tax levied by this
section applies to the sale of a used motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer, or
semitrailer, the sales price for the used motor vehicle, motorboat trailer,
or semitrailer shall not be reduced by:
(1) The value of a motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer, or
semitrailer traded in as part payment on the purchase price of the newly
acquired motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer, or semitrailer; or
(2) The amount received by the purchaser for the sale of another
motor vehicle, motorboat, trailer, or semitrailer.
(d) The revenues generated by the tax levied under this section shall
be distributed as follows:
(1) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration under this section shall be deposited as general
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
revenues;
(2) Eight and five-tenths percent (8.5%) of the taxes, interest,
penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this section shall be
deposited into the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund; and
(3) Fourteen and nine-tenths percent (14.9%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received by the secretary under this section
shall be deposited into the Educational Adequacy Fund.
(e) The excise tax levied under this section shall be collected and
paid in the same manner and at the same time as is prescribed in § 26-53-126
for the collection and payment of compensating use taxes on motor vehicles,
motorboat, trailers, and semitrailers.
(f) As used in this section, "motorboat" means the same as defined in
§ 27-101-103.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 53, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-53-151. Tax on new and used motorboats — Payment and collection —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "motorboat" means the same as defined in
§ 27-101-103.
(b)(1) Upon applying for a certificate of number in this state, a new
or used motorboat required to be registered with a certificate of number in
this state is subject to the tax levied in this subchapter and all other use
taxes levied by the state regardless of whether the motorboat was purchased
from a dealer or an individual.
(2)(A) On or before the time for applying for a certificate of
number as prescribed by § 27-101-304, the person making application for a
certificate of number for the motorboat shall pay the taxes to the Secretary
of the Department of Finance and Administration instead of the taxes being
collected by the dealer or individual seller.
(B) The secretary shall collect the taxes before issuing a
certificate of number for the motorboat.
(3) The exemption in § 26-52-401(17) for isolated sales does not
apply to the sale of a motorboat.
(4) If the person making application for a certificate of number
for a motorboat fails to pay the taxes when due:
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
(A) There is assessed a penalty equal to ten percent (10%)
of the amount of taxes due; and
(B) The person making application for a certificate of
number for a motorboat shall pay to the secretary the penalty under
subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section and the taxes due before the secretary
issues a certificate of number for the motorboat.
(c)(1) When a used motorboat is taken in trade as a credit or part
payment on the sale of a new or used motorboat, the tax levied in this
subchapter and all other use taxes levied by the state shall be paid on the
net difference between the total consideration for the new or used motorboat
sold and the credit for the used motorboat taken in trade.
(2)(A)(i) If the total consideration for the sale of the new or
used motorboat is less than four thousand dollars ($4,000), no tax is due.
(ii) If the total consideration for the sale of a
new motorboat is four thousand dollars ($4,000) or more, the full
compensating use tax rate levied under this chapter shall be levied and
collected.
(B) If the total consideration for the sale of a used
motorboat is at least four thousand dollars ($4,000) but less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), the compensating use tax due shall be determined
under § 26-53-150.
(C) If the total consideration for the sale of a used
motorboat is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more:
(i) The exemption under subdivision (c)(2)(A)(i) of
this section does not apply;
(ii) The special tax rate provided in § 26-53-150
does not apply; and
(iii) The full compensating use tax rate levied
under this chapter shall be levied and collected.
(3)(A) When a used motorboat is sold by a consumer, rather than
traded in as a credit or part payment on the sale of a new or used motorboat,
and the consumer subsequently purchases a new or used motorboat of greater
value within sixty (60) days of the sale, the tax levied by this chapter and
all other gross receipts taxes levied by the state shall be paid on the net
difference between the total consideration for the new or used motorboat
purchased subsequently and the amount received from the sale of the used
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
motorboat sold in lieu of a trade-in.
(B)(i) Upon applying for a certificate of number for the
new or used motorboat, a consumer claiming the deduction provided by
subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section shall provide a bill of sale signed by
all parties to the transaction which reflects the total consideration paid to
the seller for the motorboat.
(ii) A copy of the bill of sale shall be deposited
with the department at the time of registration of the new or used motorboat.
(iii) The deduction provided by this subdivision
(c)(3) shall not be allowed unless the taxpayer claiming the deduction
provides a copy of a bill of sale signed by all parties to the transaction
that reflects the total consideration paid to the seller for the motorboat.
(C) If the taxpayer claiming the deduction provided in
this subdivision (c)(3) fails to provide a bill of sale signed by all parties
to the transaction that reflects the total consideration paid to the seller
for the motorboat, tax shall be due on the total consideration paid for the
new or used motorboat without any deduction for the value of the item sold.
(d) The tax imposed by this subchapter does not apply to a motorboat
to be registered by a bona fide nonresident of this state.
(e) This section does not repeal any exemption from this subchapter.
(f)(1) Upon payment of all applicable fees, a motorboat dealer with a
permit under § 27-101-302(5) who has purchased a used motorboat may apply for
a certificate of number for the motorboat for the sole purpose of obtaining a
certificate of title to the vehicle without payment of use tax.
(2) If a certificate of number is issued for a motorboat under §
27-101-302(5)(C), the used motorboat titled by a dealer under this subsection
may not be operated on the waters of this state unless there is displayed on
the used motorboat the identifying certificate of number issued under § 27-
101-302(5)(C).
(g)(1) For purposes of this section, the total consideration for a
used motorboat shall be presumed to be the greater of the actual sales price
as provided on a bill of sale, invoice or financing agreement, or the average
loan value of the motorboat as listed in the most current edition of a
publication which is generally accepted by the industry as providing an
accurate valuation of used motorboats.
(2) If the published loan value exceeds the invoiced price, the
02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 SB49
taxpayer shall establish to the secretary's satisfaction that the price
reflected on the invoice or other document is true and correct.
(3) If the secretary determines that the invoiced price is not
the actual selling price of the motorboat, the total consideration shall be
deemed to be the published loan value.

SECTION 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 through 6 of this act are
effective on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective
date of this act.

/s/J. Boyd

























02-12-2025 10:39:38 CEB013